Illinois, session 104th, HB2847.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Income Tax Act is amended by 5adding Section 246 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 5/246 new)7    Sec. 246. Credit for employment of persons with 8developmental disabilities or severe mental illness.9    (a) For taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 102025, a taxpayer who employs a person with a developmental 11disability or a severe mental illness, as certified by the 12Department of Human Services, during the taxable year is 13entitled to a credit against the taxes imposed by subsections 14(a) and (b) of Section 201 in an amount equal to 25% of the 15wages paid by the taxpayer to the person with a developmental 16disability or severe mental illness, but not to exceed $6,000 17in wages paid during the taxable year to any single qualified 18employee. 19    (b) The taxpayer shall apply, in the form and manner 20required by the Department of Human Services, for a 21determination of whether an employee meets the requirements 22under subsection (a). If an employee meets the requirements, a 23letter of certification containing the names of the taxpayer   HB2847- 2 -LRB104 08410 HLH 18461 b1and the qualifying employee shall be issued by the Department 2of Human Services to the taxpayer. The Department of Human 3Services shall adopt rules for the certification of employees 4under this Section. 5    (c) The tax credit may not reduce the taxpayer's liability 6to less than zero. If the amount of the tax credit exceeds the 7tax liability for the year, the excess may be carried forward 8and applied to the tax liability of the 5 taxable years 9following the excess credit year. The credit must be applied 10to the earliest year for which there is a tax liability. If 11there are credits from more than one tax year that are 12available to offset a liability, then the earlier credit must 13be applied first. 14    (d) If the taxpayer is a partnership or Subchapter S 15corporation, the credit is allowed to the partners or 16shareholders in accordance with Section 251. 17    (e) This Section is exempt from the provisions of Section 18250.  19    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 20becoming law.